public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ar eràe/S inkartonar
SFX A ar eràe/S intarsiar
SFX A ar eràe/S interesar
SFX A ar eràe/S interkalar
SFX A ar eràe/S interkuerar
SFX A ar eràe/S interkuirar
SFX A ar eràe/S interlinear
SFX A ar eràe/S intermeđar
SFX A ar eràe/S interogar
SFX A ar eràe/S interpretar
SFX A ar eràe/S inveriar
SFX A ar eràe/S inversiar
SFX A ar eràe/S inŧercelar
SFX A ar eràe/S kalar
SFX A ar eràe/S kalefar
SFX A ar eràe/S kantar
SFX A ar eràe/S kolar
SFX A ar eràe/S korniđar
SFX A ar eràe/S kriolar
SFX A ar eràe/S kurvar
SFX A ar eràe/S lotar
SFX A ar eràe/S lumar
SFX A ar eràe/S lustrar
SFX A ar eràe/S maravejar
SFX A ar eràe/S menar
SFX A ar eràe/S meravejar
SFX A ar eràe/S merkantar
SFX A ar eràe/S merkantiđar
SFX A ar eràe/S međar
SFX A ar eràe/S mojar
SFX A ar eràe/S mudarar
SFX A ar eràe/S ojar
SFX A ar eràe/S okar
SFX A ar eràe/S ormeđar
SFX A ar eràe/S perdonar
SFX A ar eràe/S perfumar
SFX A ar eràe/S perifraxar
SFX A ar eràe/S periodar
SFX A ar eràe/S perkolar
SFX A ar eràe/S perkotar
SFX A ar eràe/S perletar
SFX A ar eràe/S perlustrar
SFX A ar eràe/S permudarar
SFX A ar eràe/S permutar
SFX A ar eràe/S perorar
SFX A ar eràe/S perpetrar
SFX A ar eràe/S perpetuar
SFX A ar eràe/S perseguitar
SFX A ar eràe/S personaliđar
SFX A ar eràe/S persugar
SFX A ar eràe/S pertegar
SFX A ar eràe/S pongar
SFX A ar eràe/S rajar
SFX A ar eràe/S ramar
SFX A ar eràe/S raxar
SFX A ar eràe/S redar
SFX A ar eràe/S rigolar
SFX A ar eràe/S rivar
SFX A ar eràe/S robar
SFX A ar eràe/S roersar
SFX A ar eràe/S rolar
SFX A ar eràe/S sajar
SFX A ar eràe/S scantiđar
SFX A ar eràe/S seguitar
SFX A ar eràe/S serajar
SFX A ar eràe/S siar
SFX A ar eràe/S skortegar
SFX A ar eràe/S sotolinear
SFX A ar eràe/S soverkiar
SFX A ar eràe/S spergoŧar
SFX A ar eràe/S sperimentar
SFX A ar eràe/S sperlongar
SFX A ar eràe/S spernacar
SFX A ar eràe/S speronar
SFX A ar eràe/S sperđurar
SFX A ar eràe/S steriliđar
SFX A ar eràe/S sugar
SFX A ar eràe/S terapienar
SFX A ar eràe/S teraŧar
SFX A ar eràe/S termenar
SFX A ar eràe/S terminar
SFX A ar eràe/S terŧariolar
SFX A ar eràe/S tonar
SFX A ar eràe/S tormentar
SFX A ar eràe/S tuar
SFX A ar eràe/S vejar
SFX A ar eràe/S velar
SFX A ar eràe/S verdeđar
SFX A ar eràe/S vergiđar
SFX A ar eràe/S vergoñar
SFX A ar eràe/S verifegar
SFX A ar eràe/S verigolar
SFX A ar eràe/S verolar
SFX A ar eràe/S versar
SFX A ar eràe/S verxurar
SFX A ar eràe/S verđelar
SFX A ar eràe/S xberlefar
SFX A ar eràe/S xberlotar
SFX A ar eràe/S xberlumar
SFX A ar eràe/S xberxelar
SFX A ar eràe/S xelar
SFX A ar eràe/S xermojar
SFX A ar eràe/S xgoñar
SFX A ar eràe/S xlargiđar
SFX A ar eràe/S xmerdar
SFX A ar eràe/S xmerejar
SFX A ar eràe/S xmeriliar
SFX A ar eràe/S xmerŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/S xmorgolar
SFX A ar eràe/S xnervađar
SFX A ar eràe/S xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar eràe/S đurar
SFX A ar eràe/S ŧercar
SFX A ar eràe/S ŧitar
SFX A ar erè/K [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar erè/K [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar erè/K [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar erè/K [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar erè/K [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar erè/K [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar erè/K [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar erè/K [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar erè/K [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar erè/K [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar erè/K [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar erè/K [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar erè/K [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar erè/K [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [abik]rokar
SFX A ar erè/K [abikoptu]riar
SFX A ar erè/K [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar erè/K [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeio]strar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A ar erè/K [aelo]var
SFX A ar erè/K [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeo]liar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar erè/K [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar erè/K [agot]rejar
SFX A ar erè/K [ai]erar
SFX A ar erè/K [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [ail]gar
SFX A ar erè/K [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar erè/K [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar erè/K [ailu]minar
SFX A ar erè/K [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar erè/K [aisu]kiar
SFX A ar erè/K [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar erè/K [als]tar
SFX A ar erè/K [an]deđar
SFX A ar erè/K [an]fraxar
SFX A ar erè/K [an]kuerar
SFX A ar erè/K [an]kuirar
SFX A ar erè/K [ano]fegar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]niđar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rcar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rdar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rkar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rnar
SFX A ar erè/K [ao]rsar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]nŧiar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rbar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rgar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rkiar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rlar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rtar
SFX A ar erè/K [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar erè/K [aux]nar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar erè/K [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdfjmnptvx]iar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar erè/K [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar erè/K [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar erè/K [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar erè/K [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar erè/K [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar erè/K [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar erè/K [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar erè/K [bou]rogar
SFX A ar erè/K [bp]erlar
SFX A ar erè/K [btv]ergar
SFX A ar erè/K [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar erè/K [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar erè/K [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar erè/K [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar erè/K [dg]obar
SFX A ar erè/K [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar erè/K [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar erè/K [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar erè/K [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar erè/K [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [eilox]mar
SFX A ar erè/K [einoru]xar
SFX A ar erè/K [einosu]car
SFX A ar erè/K [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar erè/K [eo]liđar
SFX A ar erè/K [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar erè/K [es]kotar
SFX A ar erè/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar erè/K [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar erè/K [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar erè/K [fm]eretar
SFX A ar erè/K [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar erè/K [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar erè/K [gin]ritar
SFX A ar erè/K [iln]trar
SFX A ar erè/K [inru]jar
SFX A ar erè/K [io]ntar
SFX A ar erè/K [io]rkolar
SFX A ar erè/K [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar erè/K [ipu]lar
SFX A ar erè/K [irst]umar
SFX A ar erè/K [klt]ivar
SFX A ar erè/K [kp]avejar
SFX A ar erè/K [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar erè/K [ln]etrar
SFX A ar erè/K [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar erè/K [mp]eritar
SFX A ar erè/K [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar erè/K [ns]erbar
SFX A ar erè/K [ns]ervar
SFX A ar erè/K [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar erè/K [nsv]edar
SFX A ar erè/K [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar erè/K [op]ar
SFX A ar erè/K [ox]longar
SFX A ar erè/K [pt]resar
SFX A ar erè/K [pt]rotar
SFX A ar erè/K [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar erè/K [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar erè/K [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar erè/K [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar erè/K [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar erè/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar erè/K alar
SFX A ar erè/K alienar
SFX A ar erè/K amar
SFX A ar erè/K arar
SFX A ar erè/K bersajar
SFX A ar erè/K bertonar
SFX A ar erè/K bordeđar
SFX A ar erè/K dar
SFX A ar erè/K deramar
SFX A ar erè/K derenar
SFX A ar erè/K derivar
SFX A ar erè/K derobar
SFX A ar erè/K derokar
SFX A ar erè/K derotar
SFX A ar erè/K desferenŧiar
SFX A ar erè/K devorar
SFX A ar erè/K devorŧiar
SFX A ar erè/K dexeredar
SFX A ar erè/K dexverxenar
SFX A ar erè/K donar
SFX A ar erè/K exerŧitar
SFX A ar erè/K far
SFX A ar erè/K fermentar
SFX A ar erè/K fumar
SFX A ar erè/K griliar
SFX A ar erè/K guernar
SFX A ar erè/K inbaretar
SFX A ar erè/K infervorar
SFX A ar erè/K inkartonar
SFX A ar erè/K intarsiar
SFX A ar erè/K interesar
SFX A ar erè/K interkalar
SFX A ar erè/K interkuerar
SFX A ar erè/K interkuirar
SFX A ar erè/K interlinear
SFX A ar erè/K intermeđar
SFX A ar erè/K interogar
SFX A ar erè/K interpretar
SFX A ar erè/K inveriar
SFX A ar erè/K inversiar
SFX A ar erè/K inŧercelar
SFX A ar erè/K kalar
SFX A ar erè/K kalefar
SFX A ar erè/K kantar
SFX A ar erè/K kolar
SFX A ar erè/K korniđar
SFX A ar erè/K kriolar
SFX A ar erè/K kurvar
SFX A ar erè/K lotar
SFX A ar erè/K lumar
SFX A ar erè/K lustrar
SFX A ar erè/K maravejar
SFX A ar erè/K menar
