public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aflíxer/A
albitrar/A
alegrar/A
alŧetar/A
reandar/A
angosiar/A
arborar/A
argomentar/A
arpiar/A
inasiar/A
aŧalar/A
inaugurar/A
axardar/A
avar/A
bagajar/A
xbajafar/A
xbaketar/A
balanŧar/A
inbalinar/A
xbalotar/A
xbalŧar/A
bandonar/A
xbanpolar/A
xbarakar/A
xbarbatolar/A
xbarkar/A
barxeletar/A
bastardar/A
batiđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
bavar/A
xbaxir/A
xbefeđar/A
inbeletar/A
xberlefar/A
betegar/A
xbevakiar/A
xbiankir/A
xbiaxemar/A
binar/A
dexbingolar/A
inbironar/A
bituar/A
blaterar/A
sobójer/A
soboɉir/A
inbokolar/A
xboloñar/A
bonir/A
xbonbardar/A
borir/A
bordelar/A
xborsar/A
inbotar/A
xbotonar/A
inbovolar/A
bragañar/A
xbrajar/A
inbrankar/A
xbratar/A
xbrefelar/A
inbriagar/A
brinkar/A
brojar/A
dexbrokar/A
inbronbar/A
inbrular/A
bruskiar/A
xbuelar/A
bulegar/A
inbusolotar/A
xbuxar/A
buxnar/A
descapar/A
carlar/A
incefar/A
acèñer/A
recèñer/A
intracéñer/A
cetar/A
cikar/A
incodar/A
copar/A
indir/A
dameɉar/A
indebitar/A
dentar/A
depénxer/A
déver/A
dialogar/A
distribuir/A
predíxer/A
indogar/A
indolŧir/A
domestegar/A
dexdopiar/A
indorar/A
indosar/A
xdrelar/A
adular/A
introdúxer/A
đaliđar/A
ađónxer/A
skonđurar/A
emular/A
ineskar/A
exerŧitar/A
sodisfar/A
sfakinar/A
sfamar/A
farsir/A
favoređar/A
paxifegar/A
sfenir/A
preferir/A
dexfetar/A
infiankir/A
desfidar/A
desfilar/A
fínxer/A
prefisar/A
reflèter/A
desfogonar/A
sfondar/A
formar/A
fornegar/A
frakasar/A
sfrapuñar/A
infraxar/A
frexiar/A
konfrontar/A
sfugaŧar/A
sfuregar/A
dexgajar/A
ingalopar/A
xgañolir/A
xgargariđar/A
ingaxetar/A
gòder/A
xgorgar/A
xgrameñar/A
xgranfiñar/A
gravar/A
dexgrendenar/A
xgriñar/A
xgrongolar/A
guantar/A
guastar/A
xgusar/A
indatejar/A
iniŧiar/A
insir/A
intronar/A
exíɉer/A
ɉegomarar/A
dexɉoŧar/A
skadenar/A
interkalar/A
kalmar/A
skalumar/A
skanbiar/A
dekanpar/A
skanŧelar/A
rekapitolar/A
inkaratelar/A
karnevalar/A
inkartelar/A
inkastelar/A
deskatiɉar/A
kautar/A
skaveɉar/A
inklúder/A
koɉonar/A
kolgar/A
komenŧar/A
skonbàter/A
konpir/A
skontar/A
rekonŧar/A
konkórer/A
konkordar/A
koronar/A
kostumar/A
kòxer/A
kreventar/A
kronpar/A
kruŧiar/A
inkuercar/A
inkuirar/A
kuniar/A
kustionar/A
xlangolir/A
delapidar/A
laudar/A
xlekiñar/A
letarar/A
deliberar/A
xlimegar/A
lodar/A
lontanar/A
xlubiar/A
luxingar/A
xmaɉar/A
manaŧar/A
manifestar/A
maravejar/A
xmaronar/A
maskarar/A
inmatonir/A
inmaxerir/A
xmemorar/A
dexmentegar/A
mestierar/A
reméter/A
minconar/A
inmixerir/A
dexmolar/A
amontar/A
amorbar/A
morsegar/A
moxegar/A
tramuarar/A
dexmusar/A
muxolar/A
naufragar/A
netar/A
noɉar/A
xnuar/A
ñokolar/A
inoɉar/A
onbriđar/A
orbar/A
ormeđar/A
oviar/A
padroneđar/A
paiŧar/A
palpeđar/A
konpaniđar/A
parer/A
paređar/A
parteŧipar/A
apasionar/A
patentar/A
inpaurir/A
inpegar/A
inpelugar/A
depénđer/A
pensionar/A
periodar/A
pestar/A
petolar/A
inpeverar/A
pianđotar/A
pikar/A
spiolar/A
inpirolar/A
inpiŧar/A
inplikar/A
despolverar/A
inpóner/A
spongar/A
pontolar/A
reportar/A
potar/A
precixar/A
preŧar/A
privar/A
provokar/A
deputar/A
skorabiar/A
raɉar/A
ranponar/A
raŧionar/A
regalar/A
restelar/A
rigolar/A
robakiar/A
irokar/A
rónper/A
roveɉar/A
ruimar/A
inruxenir/A
insakolar/A
salmistrar/A
sanguenar/A
saŧiar/A
scolar/A
strasekolar/A
konsèguer/A
inseɉar/A
senpiar/A
señorar/A
sesolar/A
sfrutar/A
desimilar/A
insíster/A
skandaɉar/A
iskarselar/A
skiantar/A
skortar/A
reskríver/A
soɉar/A
solfiđar/A
insoñar/A
insoŧolar/A
spaxemar/A
isperonar/A
spigaŧar/A
spiumaŧar/A
sprotar/A
restabilir/A
stangar/A
istekir/A
stipular/A
instivalar/A
strakolar/A
strepitar/A
instruir/A
instukar/A
insubiotar/A
asunar/A
suŧar/A
staɉuŧar/A
tanajar/A
tarar/A
intaskar/A
tecar/A
sorainténder/A
tenprar/A
aparteñir/A
intratèñer/A
retéñer/A
interŧar/A
timonar/A
titubar/A
tonbar/A
torcar/A
destòrđer/A
detràer/A
trakeɉar/A
trarar/A
travaɉar/A
treŧar/A
intristar/A
retrovar/A
turgar/A
ŧavarɉar/A
ŧentraliđar/A
inŧèrner/A
ŧifolar/A
postiŧipar/A
ŧotar/A
unir/A
invàder/A
stravanir/A
revardar/A
ravéder/A
invelenar/A
ventilar/A
perveñir/A
pervèñer/A
xvergolar/A
inversiar/A
revestir/A
divíder/A
virar/A
avixar/A
volar/A
xvoltolar/A
xafar/A
xbaratar/A
inxeloxir/A
xgurar/A
xmergolar/A
xufar/A
